Washington statutes.
RCW 15.37.100

Coloring of milk in containers, when required.

It shall be unlawful for any person to sell, offer for sale, hold for sale, advertise for sale, trade, barter, or to give as an inducement for the sale of another product, any milk, cream, or skim milk, for animal food consumption which does not meet, or has not been produced under conditions prescribed for grade A milk, as prescribed in chapter 15.36 RCW as enacted or hereafter amended and rules adopted thereunder, and the applicable provisions of chapter 69.04 RCW (the Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act) as enacted and hereafter amended and rules adopted thereunder, in containers provided either by the vendor or vendee and which are capable of holding less than twenty liquid quarts, unless such milk, cream, or skim milk has been decharacterized with a color prescribed by the director which will not affect its nutritive value for animal food.

[ 1961 c 285 s 10.]